Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1001
Plans authorized; when; contents.

Whenever in the opinion of any of the governing bodies of any city, town, village or county, acting severally or jointly, it is found desirable in order to properly use, improve and develop a conservation or recreational area which is situated partly within the corporate limits or within the jurisdiction or supervision of any city, town, village or county, and when to properly develop and improve and use said area it is deemed advisable and necessary to correlate said project with the use, development and improvement of an adjacent or contiguous area in an adjoining state or states, the proper governing body or bodies having jurisdiction thereof may have a plan prepared, showing the area or areas under consideration, and the use, development and improvement contemplated, and the relation thereof to the area or areas outside of Nebraska, adjoining or contiguous thereto.

Laws 1935, c. 39, § 1, p. 155;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1701;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-901.